Hawaii statutes.
[§329D-18] Diversion from dispensary or
production center; penalties. (a) A person commits diversion from a
dispensary or production center if the person is a licensee, operator, or
employee of a dispensary or production center and intentionally or knowingly
diverts to the person's own use or other unauthorized or illegal use, or takes,
makes away with, or secretes, with intent to divert to the person's own use or
other unauthorized or illegal use, any medical marijuana, manufactured
marijuana product, or marijuana concentrate under the person's possession,
care, or custody as a licensee, operator, or employee of a medical marijuana
dispensary or production center licensed by the department.

(b) Any person who violates this section shall
be guilty of a class C felony. [L 2015, c 241, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next